Texas, session 892, HB23.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.23, Tax Code, is amended by adding Subsection (n) to read as follows: (n)  Promotion of Agriculture, Support of Youth, and Provision of Educational Support in Populous Counties.  In a county with a population of 3.3 million or more, all real and personal property owned by a nonprofit corporation, as that term is defined by Section 22.001, Business Organizations Code, organized exclusively for charitable, educational, and scientific purposes, and held for use in promoting agriculture, supporting youth, and providing educational support in the community is exempt from all ad valorem taxation.  This subsection does not exempt from ad valorem taxation any interest in real or personal property, including a leasehold or other possessory interest, of a for-profit lessee of property for which a nonprofit corporation is entitled to an exemption from taxation under this subsection. SECTION 2.  This Act applies only to an ad valorem tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I certify that H.B. No. 23 was passed by the House on August 25, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 113, Nays 13, 1 present, not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House I certify that H.B. No. 23 was passed by the Senate on August 26, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 26, Nays 1. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate APPROVED:  _____________________ Date _____________________ Governor